Nevada, session 83, AB127.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office for New Americans in the Office of the
Governor created by NRS 223.910 the sum of $5,000,000 for the
award of grants of money to the governing bodies of counties and
cities in this State for the implementation of language access plans
pursuant to NRS 244.184 and 268.01925.
2. Not more than $200,000 of the money appropriated by
subsection 1 may be used by the Office for New Americans for
administrative costs incurred relating to the awarding of grants
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
-
*AB127*

– 2 –
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB127*